Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1719
Mobile massage therapy establishment; application; review; denial; inspection; issuance of permanent license.

Each application for a license to operate a mobile massage therapy establishment shall be reviewed by the department for compliance with the requirements of the Massage Therapy Practice Act and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department under the act. If an application is denied, the applicant shall be informed in writing of the grounds for denial, and such denial shall not prejudice future applications by the applicant. If an application is approved, the department shall issue the applicant a certificate of consideration to operate a mobile massage therapy establishment. The department shall conduct an operation inspection of each establishment issued a certificate of consideration within six months after the issuance of such certificate. An establishment which passes the inspection shall be issued a permanent license. An establishment which fails the inspection shall submit within fifteen days evidence of corrective action taken to improve those aspects of operation found deficient. If evidence is not submitted within fifteen days or if after a second inspection the establishment does not receive a satisfactory rating, it shall immediately relinquish its certificate of consideration and cease operation.

Laws 2019, LB244, § 8.